Utah statutes.
78A-5-101.   State District Court Administrative System.
(1)  The district court is a trial court of general jurisdiction.
(2)  There is established a State District Court Administrative System.  The
Judicial Council shall administer the operation of the system.
(3)  In this chapter, "court system" means the State District Court
Administrative System.
(4)  A district court shall be located in the county seat of each county.
